Washington statutes.
RCW 18.71.470

International medical graduate implementation work group—Membership—Duties—Reporting. (Expires July 1, 2025.)

(1) The international medical graduate implementation work group is established. The work group membership must consist of the following members appointed by the governor:

(a) A representative from the commission;

(b) A representative from the department of health, health systems quality assurance division;

(c) A representative from the University of Washington school of medicine graduate medical education program;

(d) A representative from the Washington State University Elson S. Floyd college of medicine graduate medical education program;

(e) A representative from the Pacific Northwest University of Health Sciences college of osteopathic medicine graduate medical education program;

(f) A representative from a statewide association representing physicians;

(g) A representative from the Washington state family medicine residency network;

(h) A representative from a primary care health care employer in a rural or underserved area of Washington;

(i) A representative from a health carrier offering coverage in a rural or underserved area of Washington;

(j) A licensed physician with experience working with international medical graduates;

(k) A representative from an organization specializing in refugee advocacy in Washington;

(l) A representative from an organization serving refugee physicians and international medical graduates;

(m) A representative from an organization offering counseling and educational programs to internationally trained health professionals;

(n) A representative from an organization representing community and migrant health centers; and

(o) At least two international medical graduates.

(2) Staff support for the work group must be provided by the department of health.

(3) The work group shall:

(a) Propose clinical readiness criteria for international medical graduates using published benchmarks for medical school graduation or residency admission;

(b) Propose a grant award process for distributing funds for approved entities to provide career guidance and clinical training to international medical graduates;

(c) Propose an evaluation process to grant a hardship waiver to international medical graduates who cannot provide all necessary documentation for licensure due to circumstances outside their control; and

(d) Provide policy recommendations to the legislature.

(4) The work group must submit an annual report to the legislature by June 30, 2021, and yearly thereafter.

(5) This section expires July 1, 2025.

[ 2020 c 325 s 1.]